West Virginia, session 2025, SB572.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. COUNTY COMMISSIONS GENERALLY. §30-1-27. Prohibiting spending authority for money used by a board or commission that retains a labor position. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2025, any provisions of this code that require a person from or representing labor on any board or commission are nullified. The code requirements of the previous labor position shall be satisfied with a lay person appointment that is not affiliated with organized labor. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2025, spending authority for any board or commission is prohibited until the board or commission is in compliance with this section.